Mississippi, session 2026, SB2408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission. (b) "Levee project" means a levee system bordering portions of the Yazoo River, within Yazoo County, and funded by federal grants and/or appropriations. (c) "Political subdivision" means any agency, board, department or commission of the State of Mississippi or of the federal government and any political subdivision of the State of Mississippi. (2) The commission shall be authorized to construct a Levee Project and perform, without limitation, all necessary construction, pre-construction and design activities, including environmental mitigation activities and right-of-way acquisitions. (3) The commission shall be authorized to enter into contracts with public and private entities, as it deems necessary, to carry out the purposes of this section. (4) The authority granted under this section shall be construed liberally to authorize the performance of any and all activities necessary to construct the levee project. (5) The commission shall be authorized to maintain the Levee Project and to contract with one or more political subdivisions for such maintenance for a period not to exceed ninety nine (99) years.  A political subdivision may provide funding to defray the cost to maintain the levee project. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.